Utah statutes.
54-2-1.   Definitions.
As used in this title:
(1)  "Avoided costs" means the incremental costs to an electrical corporation
of electric energy or capacity or both which, due to the purchase of electric
energy or capacity or both from small power production or cogeneration
facilities, the electrical corporation would not have to generate itself or
purchase from another electrical corporation.
(2)  "Cogeneration facility":
(a)  means a facility which produces:
(i)  electric energy; and
(ii)  steam or forms of useful energy, including heat, which are used for
industrial, commercial, heating, or cooling purposes; and
(b)  is a qualifying cogeneration facility under federal law.
(3)  "Commission" means the Public Service Commission of Utah.
(4)  "Commissioner" means a member of the commission.
(5) (a)  "Corporation" includes an association, and a joint stock company
having any powers or privileges not possessed by individuals or partnerships.
(b)  "Corporation" does not include towns, cities, counties, conservancy
districts, improvement districts, or other governmental units created or
organized under any general or special law of this state.
(6)  "Distribution electrical cooperative" includes an electrical corporation
that:
(a)  is a cooperative;
(b)  conducts a business that includes the retail distribution of electricity
the cooperative purchases or generates for the cooperative's members; and
(c)  is required to allocate or distribute savings in excess of additions to
reserves and surplus on the basis of patronage to the cooperative's:
(i)  members; or
(ii)  patrons.
(7)  "Electrical corporation" includes every corporation, cooperative
association, and person, their lessees, trustees, and receivers, owning,
controlling, operating, or managing any electric plant, or in any way
furnishing electric power for public service or to its consumers or members
for domestic, commercial, or industrial use, within this state, except
independent energy producers, and except where electricity is generated on or
distributed by the producer solely for the producer's own use, or the use of
the producer's tenants, or for the use of members of an association of unit
owners formed under Title 57, Chapter 8, Condominium Ownership Act, and not
for sale to the public generally.
(8)  "Electric plant" includes all real estate, fixtures, and personal
property owned, controlled, operated, or managed in connection with or to
facilitate the production, generation, transmission, delivery, or furnishing
of electricity for light, heat, or power, and all conduits, ducts, or other
devices, materials, apparatus, or property for containing, holding, or
carrying conductors used or to be used for the transmission of electricity for
light, heat, or power.
(9)  "Gas corporation" includes every corporation and person, their lessees,
trustees, and receivers, owning, controlling, operating, or managing any gas
plant for public service within this state or for the selling or furnishing of
natural gas to any consumer or consumers within the state for domestic,
commercial, or industrial use, except in the situation that:
(a)  gas is made or produced on, and distributed by the maker or producer
through, private property:
(i)  solely for the maker's or producer's own use or the use of the maker's or
producer's tenants; and
(ii)  not for sale to others;
(b)  gas is compressed on private property solely for the owner's own use or
the use of the owner's employees as a motor vehicle fuel; or
(c)  gas is compressed by a retailer of motor vehicle fuel on the retailer's
property solely for sale as a motor vehicle fuel.
(10)  "Gas plant" includes all real estate, fixtures, and personal property
owned, controlled, operated, or managed in connection with or to facilitate
the production, generation, transmission, delivery, or furnishing of gas,
natural or manufactured, for light, heat, or power.
(11)  "Heat corporation" includes every corporation and person, their lessees,
trustees, and receivers, owning, controlling, operating, or managing any
heating plant for public service within this state.
(12) (a)  "Heating plant" includes all real estate, fixtures, machinery,
appliances, and personal property controlled, operated, or managed in
connection with or to facilitate the production, generation, transmission,
delivery, or furnishing of artificial heat.
(b)  "Heating plant" does not include either small power production facilities
or cogeneration facilities.
(13)  "Independent energy producer" means every electrical corporation,
person, corporation, or government entity, their lessees, trustees, or
receivers, that own, operate, control, or manage an independent power
production or cogeneration facility.
(14)  "Independent power production facility" means a facility that:
(a)  produces electric energy solely by the use, as a primary energy source,
of biomass, waste, a renewable resource, a geothermal resource, or any
combination of the preceding sources; or
(b)  is a qualifying power production facility.
(15)  "Private telecommunications system" includes all facilities for the
transmission of signs, signals, writing, images, sounds, messages, data, or
other information of any nature by wire, radio, lightwaves, or other
electromagnetic means, excluding mobile radio facilities, that are owned,
controlled, operated, or managed by a corporation or person, including their
lessees, trustees, receivers, or trustees appointed by any court, for the use
of that corporation or person and not for the shared use with or resale to any
other corporation or person on a regular basis.
(16) (a)  "Public utility" includes every railroad corporation, gas
corporation, electrical corporation, distribution electrical cooperative,
wholesale electrical cooperative, telephone corporation, telegraph
corporation, water corporation, sewerage corporation, heat corporation, and
independent energy producer not described in Subsection (16)(d), where the
service is performed for, or the commodity delivered to, the public generally,
or in the case of a gas corporation or electrical corporation where the gas or
electricity is sold or furnished to any member or consumers within the state
for domestic, commercial, or industrial use.
(b) (i)  If any railroad corporation, gas corporation, electrical corporation,
telephone corporation, telegraph corporation, water corporation, sewerage
corporation, heat corporation, or independent energy producer not described in
Subsection (16)(d), performs a service for or delivers a commodity to the
public, it is considered to be a public utility, subject to the jurisdiction
and regulation of the commission and this title.
(ii)  If a gas corporation, independent energy producer not described in
Subsection (16)(d), or electrical corporation sells or furnishes gas or
electricity to any member or consumers within the state, for domestic,
commercial, or industrial use, for which any compensation or payment is
received, it is considered to be a public utility, subject to the jurisdiction
and regulation of the commission and this title.
(c)  Any corporation or person not engaged in business exclusively as a public
utility as defined in this section is governed by this title in respect only
to the public utility owned, controlled, operated, or managed by the
corporation or person, and not in respect to any other business or pursuit.
(d)  An independent energy producer is exempt from the jurisdiction and
regulations of the commission with respect to an independent power production
facility if it meets the requirements of Subsection (16)(d)(i), (ii), or
(iii), or any combination of these:
(i)  the commodity or service is produced or delivered, or both, by an
independent energy producer solely for the uses exempted in Subsection (7) or
for the use of state-owned facilities;
(ii)  the commodity or service is sold by an independent energy producer
solely to an electrical corporation or other wholesale purchaser; or
(iii) (A)  the commodity or service delivered by the independent energy
producer is delivered to an entity which controls, is controlled by, or
affiliated with the independent energy producer or to a user located on real
property managed by the independent energy producer; and
(B)  the real property on which the service or commodity is used is contiguous
to real property which is owned or controlled by the independent energy
producer.  Parcels of real property separated solely by public roads or
easements for public roads shall be considered as contiguous for purposes of
this Subsection (16).
(e)  Any person or corporation defined as an electrical corporation or public
utility under this section may continue to serve its existing customers
subject to any order or future determination of the commission in reference to
the right to serve those customers.
(f) (i)  "Public utility" does not include any person that is otherwise
considered a public utility under this Subsection (16) solely because of that
person's ownership of an interest in an electric plant, cogeneration facility,
or small power production facility in this state if all of the following
conditions are met:
(A)  the ownership interest in the electric plant, cogeneration facility, or
small power production facility is leased to:
(I)  a public utility, and that lease has been approved by the commission;
(II)  a person or government entity that is exempt from commission regulation
as a public utility; or
(III)  a combination of Subsections (16)(f)(i)(A)(I) and (II);
(B)  the lessor of the ownership interest identified in Subsection
(16)(f)(i)(A) is:
(I)  primarily engaged in a business other than the business of a public
utility; or
(II)  a person whose total equity or beneficial ownership is held directly or
indirectly by another person engaged in a business other than the business of
a public utility; and
(C)  the rent reserved under the lease does not include any amount based on or
determined by revenues or income of the lessee.
(ii)  Any person that is exempt from classification as a public utility under
Subsection (16)(f)(i) shall continue to be so exempt from classification
following termination of the lessee's right to possession or use of the
electric plant for so long as the former lessor does not operate the electric
plant or sell electricity from the electric plant.  If the former lessor
operates the electric plant or sells electricity, the former lessor shall
continue to be so exempt for a period of 90 days following termination, or for
a longer period that is ordered by the commission.  This period may not exceed
one year.  A change in rates that would otherwise require commission approval
may not be effective during the 90-day or extended period without commission
approval.
(g)  "Public utility" does not include any person that provides financing for,
but has no ownership interest in an electric plant, small power production
facility, or cogeneration facility.  In the event of a foreclosure in which an
ownership interest in an electric plant, small power production facility, or
cogeneration facility is transferred to a third-party financer of an electric
plant, small power production facility, or cogeneration facility, then that
third-party financer is exempt from classification as a public utility for 90
days following the foreclosure, or for a longer period that is ordered by the
commission.  This period may not exceed one year.
(h) (i)  The distribution or transportation of natural gas for use as a motor
vehicle fuel does not cause the distributor or transporter to be a "public
utility," unless the commission, after notice and a public hearing, determines
by rule that it is in the public interest to regulate the distributers or
transporters, but the retail sale alone of compressed natural gas as a motor
vehicle fuel may not cause the seller to be a "public utility."
(ii)  In determining whether it is in the public interest to regulate the
distributors or transporters, the commission shall consider, among other
things, the impact of the regulation on the availability and price of natural
gas for use as a motor fuel.
(17)  "Purchasing utility" means any electrical corporation that is required
to purchase electricity from small power production or cogeneration facilities
pursuant to the Public Utility Regulatory Policies Act, 16 U.S.C. Section
824a-3.
(18)  "Qualifying power producer" means a corporation, cooperative
association, or person, or the lessee, trustee, and receiver of the
corporation, cooperative association, or person, who owns, controls, operates,
or manages any qualifying power production facility or cogeneration facility.
(19)  "Qualifying power production facility" means a facility that:
(a)  produces electrical energy solely by the use, as a primary energy source,
of biomass, waste, a renewable resource, a geothermal resource, or any
combination of the preceding sources;
(b)  has a power production capacity that, together with any other facilities
located at the same site, is no greater than 80 megawatts; and
(c)  is a qualifying small power production facility under federal law.
(20)  "Railroad" includes every commercial, interurban, and other railway,
other than a street railway, and each branch or extension of a railway, by any
power operated, together with all tracks, bridges, trestles, rights-of-way,
subways, tunnels, stations, depots, union depots, yards, grounds, terminals,
terminal facilities, structures, and equipment, and all other real estate,
fixtures, and personal property of every kind used in connection with a
railway owned, controlled, operated, or managed for public service in the
transportation of persons or property.
(21)  "Railroad corporation" includes every corporation and person, their
lessees, trustees, and receivers, owning, controlling, operating, or managing
any railroad for public service within this state.
(22) (a)  "Sewerage corporation" includes every corporation and person, their
lessees, trustees, and receivers, owning, controlling, operating, or managing
any sewerage system for public service within this state.
(b)  "Sewerage corporation" does not include private sewerage companies
engaged in disposing of sewage only for their stockholders, or towns, cities,
counties, conservancy districts, improvement districts, or other governmental
units created or organized under any general or special law of this state.
(23)  "Telegraph corporation" includes every corporation and person, their
lessees, trustees, and receivers, owning, controlling, operating, or managing
any telegraph line for public service within this state.
(24)  "Telegraph line" includes all conduits, ducts, poles, wires, cables,
instruments, and appliances, and all other real estate, fixtures, and personal
property owned, controlled, operated, or managed in connection with or to
facilitate communication by telegraph, whether that communication be had with
or without the use of transmission wires.
(25) (a)  "Telephone corporation" means any corporation or person, and their
lessees, trustee, receivers, or trustees appointed by any court, who owns,
controls, operates, manages, or resells a public telecommunications service as
defined in Section 54-8b-2.
(b)  "Telephone corporation" does not mean a corporation, partnership, or firm
providing:
(i)  intrastate telephone service offered by a provider of cellular, personal
communication systems (PCS), or other commercial mobile radio service as
defined in 47 U.S.C. Sec. 332 that has been issued a covering license by the
Federal Communications Commission;
(ii)  Internet service; or
(iii)  resold intrastate toll service.
(26)  "Telephone line" includes all conduits, ducts, poles, wires, cables,
instruments, and appliances, and all other real estate, fixtures, and personal
property owned, controlled, operated, or managed in connection with or to
facilitate communication by telephone whether that communication is had with
or without the use of transmission wires.
(27)  "Transportation of persons" includes every service in connection with or
incidental to the safety, comfort, or convenience of the person transported,
and the receipt, carriage, and delivery of that person and that person's
baggage.
(28)  "Transportation of property" includes every service in connection with
or incidental to the transportation of property, including in particular its
receipt, delivery, elevation, transfer, switching, carriage, ventilation,
refrigeration, icing, dunnage, storage, and hauling, and the transmission of
credit by express companies.
(29)  "Water corporation" includes every corporation and person, their
lessees, trustees, and receivers, owning, controlling, operating, or managing
any water system for public service within this state.  It does not include
private irrigation companies engaged in distributing water only to their
stockholders, or towns, cities, counties, water conservancy districts,
improvement districts, or other governmental units created or organized under
any general or special law of this state.
(30) (a)  "Water system" includes all reservoirs, tunnels, shafts, dams,
dikes, headgates, pipes, flumes, canals, structures, and appliances, and all
other real estate, fixtures, and personal property owned, controlled,
operated, or managed in connection with or to facilitate the diversion,
development, storage, supply, distribution, sale, furnishing, carriage,
appointment, apportionment, or measurement of water for power, fire
protection, irrigation, reclamation, or manufacturing, or for municipal,
domestic, or other beneficial use.
(b)  "Water system" does not include private irrigation companies engaged in
distributing water only to their stockholders.
(31)  "Wholesale electrical cooperative" includes every electrical corporation
that is:
(a)  in the business of the wholesale distribution of electricity it has
purchased or generated to its members and the public; and
(b)  required to distribute or allocate savings in excess of additions to
reserves and surplus to members or patrons on the basis of patronage.
